lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_weakGH.txt
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}min     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}min     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmin    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}meggn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}meggn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmeggn  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megn    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megn    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megten  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megten  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegten VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
